Maine, session 132, LD1142.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to authorize the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife to
reimburse volunteers of the so-called Hooked on Fishing - Not on Drugs program.
Page 1 - 132LR1370(01)